North Carolina, session 2025, HB153.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Transportation and the Department of
Environmental Quality shall jointly study the North Carolina Safety and Emissions Inspection
Program, including whether the frequency of vehicle safety and emissions inspections can be
decreased or eliminated and potential changes to the program that would add to its efficiency in
light of motor vehicle modernization, driver commute trends, and relevant changes to State and
federal programs related to motor vehicle safety and emissions inspections. The Departments
shall include all of the following in their report:
(1) North Carolina Safety and Emissions Inspections Program background.
(2) A summary of other state safety and emissions programs, as applicable.
(3) A motor vehicle inspection analysis process description.
(4) A financial analysis of the program, including the following, at a minimum:
a. State safety inspection fees.
b. State emissions inspection fees.
c. Fee generation and use summaries.
d. Program projections or issues related to fee receipts moving forward.
(5) Current program statistics and projections.
(6) Program projections due to motor vehicle modernization.
(7) The Departments shall conduct and summarize results from a motor vehicle
safety and emissions inspections station survey.
(8) The Departments shall also consider public safety, air quality, savings to
vehicle owners, impacts on State revenue trends, and potential effects to motor
vehicle inspection station industry within this State.
(9) Legislative recommendations, including changes to safety and emissions
inspections program exceptions and changes to inspection fee amounts and
their distribution, as applicable.
(10) Any other information, issues, recommendations, or topics the Departments
deem relevant.
No later than March 1, 2026, the Departments shall jointly submit their report to the
North Carolina General Assembly and the Fiscal Research Division and shall jointly report their
findings and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H153-v-2*